Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Cooperative Point Source Pollution Program.

§ 10.1-2120.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626.

§ 10.1-2121.
Cooperative point source pollution program.

In order to restore, protect and improve the quality of the bays, lakes, rivers, streams, creeks, and other state waters, and to achieve the pollution reduction goals, including those related to nutrient reduction, established in commitments made by the Commonwealth to water quality restoration, protection and improvement, including but not limited to the Chesapeake Bay Agreement, as amended, the Department shall assist local governments and individuals in the control of point source pollution, including nutrient reductions, through technical and financial assistance made available through grants provided from the Fund. In providing this technical and financial assistance the Department shall give initial priority to local government capital construction projects designed to achieve nutrient reduction goals, as provided in §

10.1-2131

, consistent with those established in the Chesapeake Bay Agreement, as amended, and thereafter to efforts consistent with other commitments made by the Commonwealth. In pursuing implementation of this cooperative program, it is the intent of the Commonwealth to annually seek and provide funding necessary to meet its commitments under any fully executed grant agreement pursuant to the provisions of §§

10.1-2130

and

10.1-2131

.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626.

§ 10.1-2122.
Additional powers and duties of the Director.

In furtherance of the purposes of this article, the Director is authorized to utilize the Fund for the purpose of providing Water Quality Improvement Grants as prescribed in Article 4 (§

10.1-2128

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626.